North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-18.1 Milk Marketing Board [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 72, § 3]

4-18.1-01.
Declaration of policy relating to milk. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 1; 1969, ch. 85, § 1; §
3.

4-18.1-02.
Purpose. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 2; 1969, ch. 85, § 2; §
3.

4-18.1-03.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 3; 1969, ch. 85, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 69, § 1; §
3.

4-18.1-04.
Milk marketing board. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 4; 1969, ch. 85, § 4; 1981, ch. 70, § 3; 1983, ch. 82, § 5; 1995, ch. 69, § 2; 2001, ch. 65, § 8; 2005, ch. 261, § 1; 2009, ch. 72, §
13; §
3.

4-18.1-05.
General powers of the board. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 5; 1969, ch. 85, § 5; §
3.

4-18.1-06.
Marketing areas. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 6; 1969, ch. 85, § 6; §
3.

4-18.1-07.
Stabilization plans. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 7; 1969, ch. 85, § 7; 1975, ch. 56, § 1; §
3.

4-18.1-08.
Licenses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 8; 1969, ch. 85, § 8; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; §
3.

4-18.1-09.
License applications. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 9; 1969, ch. 85, § 9; §
3.

4-18.1-10.
Prohibited acts. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 10; 1969, ch. 85, § 10; §
3.

4-18.1-11.
Authority of the board to regulate disruptive trade practices. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 11; 1969, ch. 85, § 11; §
3.

4-18.1-12.
Assessments by the board — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 12; 1969, ch. 85, § 12; 1975, ch. 56, § 2; 1993, ch. 51, § 7; 1995, ch. 69, § 3; §
3.

4-18.1-13.
Construction. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 13; 1969, ch. 85, § 13; 1983, ch. 82, § 6; §
3.

4-18.1-14.
Entry, inspection, and investigation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 14; 1969, ch. 85, § 14; 1975, ch. 106, § 18; 1989, ch. 84, § 1; §
3.

4-18.1-15.
Records and reports. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 15; 1969, ch. 85, § 15; §
3.

4-18.1-16.
Cooperation with other governmental agencies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 16; 1969, ch. 85, § 16; §
3.

4-18.1-17.
Remedies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 17; 1969, ch. 85, § 17; 1995, ch. 69, § 4; §
3.

4-18.1-18.
Adjudicatory functions of the board. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 18; 1969, ch. 85, § 18; 1991, ch. 342, § 1; 1995, ch. 69, § 5; §
3.

4-18.1-19.
Judicial review of adjudicatory action by the board. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 19; 1969, ch. 85, § 19; 2001, ch. 293, § 1; §
3.

4-18.1-20.
Rulemaking functions of the board. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 20; 1969, ch. 85, § 20; 2001, ch. 293, § 2; §
3.

4-18.1-21.
Judicial review of rulemaking action by the board. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 79, § 21; 1969, ch. 85, § 21; 1981, ch. 341, § 1; 2001, ch. 293, § 3; §
3.

4-18.1-22.
Local advisory boards. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 85, § 22; 1995, ch. 69, § 6; §
3.

4-18.1-23.
Referendum on continuance of program — Petitions — Contents. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 85, § 23; §
3.